Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1602
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Propane Education and Research Act are (1) to authorize the creation of an industry-financed entity which will enable the Nebraska propane industry to educate the public and industry employees about proper safety and procedures in the storage, handling, transportation, and use of propane in any of its traditional residential, commercial, recreational, or agricultural applications and (2) to support efforts to increase the efficiency and value of propane energy service to the industry and its customers.

Laws 1998, LB 699, § 2.